Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.350

License or certificate suspension—Noncompliance with support order—Reissuance.

The secretary shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order or a *residential or visitation order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the secretary's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

[ 2018 c 58 s 37; 2006 c 265 s 313. Formerly RCW 43.215.320.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: 1997 c 58 s 886 requiring a court to order certification of noncompliance with residential provisions of a court-ordered parenting plan was vetoed. Provisions ordering the department of social and health services to certify a responsible parent based on a court order to certify for noncompliance with residential provisions of a parenting plan were vetoed. See RCW 74.20A.320.

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.